Utah statutes.
32A-15a-103 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Rulemaking.
In accordance with this chapter and Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, the commission may make rules that govern the filing under
this chapter of:
(1)  a formal objection to the renewal of a retail license; and
(2)  a request for hearing filed by a retail licensee.
